Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1602
Disclosure obligations.

In a home solicitation sale the seller shall, at the outset, clearly and expressly disclose the seller's individual name, the name of the business firm or organization he represents, and the identity or kind of goods or services he offers to sell.

Laws 1974, LB 212, § 2.